Arkansas, session 2025, HB1687.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-35-108 is amended to read as follows:
4-35-108. Tax exemption of projects.
(a) Each project by All property of a water authority and all income
from each project is determined and declared by the General Assembly to be
public property used exclusively for a public purpose and shall be exempt
from ad valorem taxation by all taxing authorities.
(b) A water authority formed under this chapter is exempt from all
excise taxes of any kind or nature.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective on the
first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this act.





*JLL254*
03/04/2025 3:31:31 PM JLL254